Washington statutes.
RCW 8.20.070

Adjudication of public use or private way of necessity.

At the time and place appointed for hearing said petition, or to which the same may have been adjourned, if the court or judge thereof shall have satisfactory proof that all parties interested in the land, real estate, premises, or other property described in said petition, have been duly served with said notice as above prescribed, and shall be further satisfied by competent proof that the contemplated use for which the land, real estate, premises or other property sought to be appropriated is really a public use, or is for a private use for a private way of necessity, and that the public interest requires the prosecution of such enterprise, or the private use is for a private way of necessity, and that the land, real estate, premises or other property sought to be appropriated are required and necessary for the purposes of such enterprise, the court or judge thereof may make an order, to be recorded in the minutes of said court, directing that a jury be summoned, or called, in the manner provided by law, to ascertain the compensation which shall be made for the land, real estate, premises or other property sought to be appropriated, unless a jury be waived as in other civil cases in courts of record, in the manner prescribed by law.

[ 1927 c 88 s 1; 1897 c 46 s 1; 1890 p 297 s 4; RRS s 925. Prior: 1888 p 60 s 4.]

NOTES:

Juries, civil actions, selection, impaneling and swearing of: Chapters 2.36, 4.44 RCW.

Private ways of necessity: Chapter 8.24 RCW.